dictionaries/cy_GB.aff
SFX C Y 354
SFX C   ro          raf        ro
SFX C   ro          ri         ro
SFX C   ro          ra         ro
SFX C   ro          rwn        ro
SFX C   ro          rwch       ro
SFX C   ro          rant       ro
SFX C   ro          rir        ro
SFX C   ro          rit        ro
SFX C   ro          ret        ro
SFX C   ro          rai        ro
SFX C   ro          rem        ro
SFX C   ro          rech       ro
SFX C   ro          rent       ro
SFX C   ro          rid        ro
SFX C   ro          rais       ro
SFX C   ro          raist      ro
SFX C   ro          rodd       ro
SFX C   ro          asom       ro
SFX C   ro          asoch      ro
SFX C   ro          asant      ro
SFX C   ro          rwyd       ro
SFX C   ro          aswn       ro
SFX C   ro          asit       ro
SFX C   ro          aset       ro
SFX C   ro          asai       ro
SFX C   ro          asem       ro
SFX C   ro          asech      ro
SFX C   ro          asent      ro
SFX C   ro          asid       ro
SFX C   ro          red        ro
SFX C   ro          rwyf       ro
SFX C   ro          rych       ro
SFX C   ro          rom        ro
SFX C   ro          roch       ro
SFX C   ro          ront       ro
SFX C   ro          rer        ro
SFX C   ro          res        ro
SFX C   ro          rest       ro
SFX C   ro          rith       ro
SFX C   ro          riff       ro
SFX C   ro          ron        ro
SFX C   ro          ran        ro
SFX C   ri          raf        ri
SFX C   ri          ra         ri
SFX C   ri          rwn        ri
SFX C   ri          rwch       ri
SFX C   ri          rant       ri
SFX C   ri          rir        ri
SFX C   ri          rit        ri
SFX C   ri          ret        ri
SFX C   ri          rai        ri
SFX C   ri          rem        ri
SFX C   ri          rech       ri
SFX C   ri          rent       ri
SFX C   ri          rid        ri
SFX C   ri          rais       ri
SFX C   ri          raist      ri
SFX C   ri          rodd       ri
SFX C   ri          asom       ri
SFX C   ri          asoch      ri
SFX C   ri          asant      ri
SFX C   ri          rwyd       ri
SFX C   ri          aswn       ri
SFX C   ri          asit       ri
SFX C   ri          aset       ri
SFX C   ri          asai       ri
SFX C   ri          asem       ri
SFX C   ri          asech      ri
SFX C   ri          asent      ri
SFX C   ri          asid       ri
SFX C   ri          red        ri
SFX C   ri          rwyf       ri
SFX C   ri          rych       ri
SFX C   ri          ro         ri
SFX C   ri          rom        ri
SFX C   ri          roch       ri
SFX C   ri          ront       ri
SFX C   ri          rer        ri
SFX C   ri          res        ri
SFX C   ri          rest       ri
SFX C   ri          rith       ri
SFX C   ri          riff       ri
SFX C   ri          ron        ri
SFX C   ri          ran        ri
SFX C   ru          raf        ru
SFX C   ru          ri         ru
SFX C   ru          ra         ru
SFX C   ru          rwn        ru
SFX C   ru          rwch       ru
SFX C   ru          rant       ru
SFX C   ru          rir        ru
SFX C   ru          rit        ru
SFX C   ru          ret        ru
SFX C   ru          rai        ru
SFX C   ru          rem        ru
SFX C   ru          rech       ru
SFX C   ru          rent       ru
SFX C   ru          rid        ru
SFX C   ru          rais       ru
SFX C   ru          raist      ru
SFX C   ru          rodd       ru
SFX C   ru          asom       ru
SFX C   ru          asoch      ru
SFX C   ru          asant      ru
SFX C   ru          rwyd       ru
SFX C   ru          aswn       ru
SFX C   ru          asit       ru
SFX C   ru          aset       ru
SFX C   ru          asai       ru
SFX C   ru          asem       ru
SFX C   ru          asech      ru
SFX C   ru          asent      ru
SFX C   ru          asid       ru
SFX C   ru          red        ru
SFX C   ru          rwyf       ru
SFX C   ru          rych       ru
SFX C   ru          ro         ru
SFX C   ru          rom        ru
SFX C   ru          roch       ru
SFX C   ru          ront       ru
SFX C   ru          rer        ru
SFX C   ru          res        ru
SFX C   ru          rest       ru
SFX C   ru          rith       ru
SFX C   ru          riff       ru
SFX C   ru          ron        ru
SFX C   ru          ran        ru
SFX C   ryd         raf        ryd
SFX C   ryd         ri         ryd
SFX C   ryd         ra         ryd
SFX C   ryd         rwn        ryd
SFX C   ryd         rwch       ryd
SFX C   ryd         rant       ryd
SFX C   ryd         rir        ryd
SFX C   ryd         rit        ryd
SFX C   ryd         ret        ryd
SFX C   ryd         rai        ryd
SFX C   ryd         rem        ryd
SFX C   ryd         rech       ryd
SFX C   ryd         rent       ryd
SFX C   ryd         rid        ryd
SFX C   ryd         rais       ryd
SFX C   ryd         raist      ryd
SFX C   ryd         rodd       ryd
SFX C   ryd         asom       ryd
SFX C   ryd         asoch      ryd
SFX C   ryd         asant      ryd
SFX C   ryd         rwyd       ryd
SFX C   ryd         aswn       ryd
SFX C   ryd         asit       ryd
SFX C   ryd         aset       ryd
SFX C   ryd         asai       ryd
SFX C   ryd         asem       ryd
SFX C   ryd         asech      ryd
SFX C   ryd         asent      ryd
SFX C   ryd         asid       ryd
SFX C   ryd         red        ryd
SFX C   ryd         rwyf       ryd
SFX C   ryd         rych       ryd
SFX C   ryd         ro         ryd
SFX C   ryd         rom        ryd
SFX C   ryd         roch       ryd
SFX C   ryd         ront       ryd
SFX C   ryd         rer        ryd
SFX C   ryd         res        ryd
SFX C   ryd         rest       ryd
SFX C   ryd         rith       ryd
SFX C   ryd         riff       ryd
SFX C   ryd         ron        ryd
SFX C   ryd         ran        ryd
SFX C   ïo          ïaf        ïo
SFX C   ïo          i          ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïa         ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïa'i       ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïa'u       ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïa'ch      ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïa'n       ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïa'r       ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïwn        ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïwch       ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïant       ïo
SFX C   ïo          iir        ïo
SFX C   ïo          iit        ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïet        ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïai        ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïai'i      ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïai'u      ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïai'ch     ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïai'n      ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïai'r      ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïem        ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïech       ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïent       ïo
SFX C   ïo          iid        ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïais       ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïaist      ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïodd       ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïasom      ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïasoch     ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïasant     ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïwyd       ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïaswn      ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïasit      ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïaset      ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïasai      ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïasai'i    ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïasai'u    ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïasai'ch   ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïasai'n    ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïasai'r    ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïasem      ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïasech     ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïasent     ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïasid      ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïed        ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïwyf       ïo
SFX C   ïo          ych        ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïo         ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïo'i       ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïo'u       ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïo'ch      ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïo'n       ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïo'r       ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïom        ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïoch       ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïont       ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïer        ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïes        ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïest       ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïth        ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïff        ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïon        ïo
SFX C   ïo          ïan        ïo
